Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.14.310

Judicial dissolution or supervision of voluntary dissolution—Procedure.

(1) Venue for any proceeding to dissolve a corporation or to supervise a voluntary dissolution brought by any party named in RCW 23B.14.300 lies in the county where a corporation's registered office is or was last located.

(2) It is not necessary to make shareholders or directors parties to a proceeding to dissolve a corporation or to supervise a voluntary dissolution unless relief is sought against them individually.

(3) A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation or to supervise a voluntary dissolution may issue injunctions, appoint a general or custodial receiver with all powers and duties the court directs, and take other action required to preserve the corporate assets wherever located. A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may also carry on the business of the corporation until a full hearing can be held.

[ 2006 c 52 s 15; 1989 c 165 s 164.]